Utah statutes.
58-37-11.   District court jurisdiction to enjoin violations -- Jury trial.

(1) The district courts of this state shall have jurisdiction in proceedings in accordance with the rules of those courts to enjoin violations of this act.

(2)  If an alleged violation of an injunction or restraining order issued under this section occurs, the accused may demand a jury trial in accordance with the rules of the district courts.



Enacted by Chapter 145, 1971 General Session

